nb: Skotre-design: Støvelformer; Hengende sedertreblokk; Pumps/høyhæl-shapere; Solid (i ett stykke); Split tå; Fjærbelastet; Teleskopisk/justerbar lengde; Reise (sammenleggbar); Annet
en: Shoe tree design: Boot shaper; Hanging cedar block; Pump/high-heel shaper; Solid (one-piece); Split toe; Spring-loaded; Telescopic/adjustable length; Travel (collapsible); Other
ru: Конструкция колодки для обуви: Формодержатель для сапог; Подвесной кедровый блок; Для туфель-лодочек/туфель на высоком каблуке; Цельный (монолитный); Разрезной носок; Пружинная конструкция; Телескопическая/регулируемая длина; Дорожный (складной); Другое
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на обтегач за обувки: Средства за оформяне на ботуши; Висящо кедрово блокче; Аксесоар за запазване формата на обувки с висок ток; Плътно (еднокомпонентно); С разделен връх; Пружинно; Телескопична/регулируема дължина; За път (сгъваемо); Друго
ko: 슈트리 디자인: 부츠 쉐이퍼; 걸이용 삼나무 블록; 펌프스/하이힐 셰이퍼; 일체형; 분할형; 스프링 탑재; 텔레스코픽/길이 조절 가능; 여행용(접이식); 기타
sv: Skoblockdesign: Stövelformare; Hängande cederblock; Pumps/högklackade shaperskor; Solid (i ett stycke); Delad tå; Fjäderladdad; Teleskopisk / justerbar längd; Resa (hopfällbar); Annat
da: Skoblokdesign: Støvleformer; Hængende cedertræsblok; Former til pump eller høje hæle; Solid (ét stykke); Split toe; Fjederbaseret; Teleskopisk/justerbar længde; Rejse (sammenklappelig); Andet
vi: Thiết kế cây giữ phom giày: Định hình giày; Khối gỗ tuyết tùng treo; Dụng cụ định hình giày cao gót/bơm gót; Nguyên khối (một mảnh); Mũi xẻ; Chịu tải bằng lò xo; Chiều dài có thể điều chỉnh/tăng giảm; Dạng du lịch (có thể gấp gọn); Khác
fr: Conception de l’embauchoir: Embauchoir; Bloc de cèdre suspendu; Forme pour escarpins/talons hauts; Bout fendu; Split fendus; À ressort; Longueur télescopique/réglable; Voyage (pliable); Autre
tr: Ayakkabı kalıbı tasarımı: Çizme kalıpları; Askılı sedir bloğu; Yüksek topuklu ayakkabı kalıbı; Katı (tek parça); Bölünmüş burun; Yaylı mekanizma; Teleskopik/ayarlanabilir uzunluk; Seyahat tipi (katlanabilir); Diğer
hr-HR: Dizajn napinjača za cipele: Kalp za čizme; Viseći blok od cedrovine; Oblikovatelj cipele s visokom petom; Jednodijelni; Odvojeni nožni prst; S oprugom; Proširivi/podesiva duljina; Putni (sklopivi); Ostalo
hu: Cipőfa kialakítása: Cipőformázó; Függő cédrusblokk; Pumps/magassarkú formázó; Tömör (egy darabból álló); Osztott orrú; Rugós; Teleszkópos/állítható hosszúságú; Utazó (összecsukható); Egyéb
zh-TW: 鞋撐設計: 靴撐; 懸掛式雪松鞋撐; 高跟鞋塑形器; 實心 (一體式); 分趾式; 彈簧式; 伸縮/長度可調; 旅行用 (摺疊式); 其他
zh-CN: 鞋撑设计: 靴撑; 悬挂式雪松块; 浅口鞋/高跟鞋定型器; 一体式; 分趾式; 弹簧式; 伸缩/可调节长度; 旅行型（可折叠）; 其他
pt-BR: Design do modelador de sapatos: Modeladores de botas; Bloco de cedro pendurado; Modelador de sapatos de salto alto; Sólido (peça única); Dedo dividido; Com mola; Comprimento telescópico/ajustável; Dobrável para viagem; Outro
pt-PT: Design da forma para calçado: Molde para botas; Bloco de cedro pendurado; Modelador para scarpin/salto alto; Sólido (peça única); Bico dividido; Com mola; Telescópico/comprimento ajustável; Viagem (dobrável); Outro
lt-LT: Batų formuoklio konstrukcija: Batų aulo formuoklis; Pakabinamas kedro medienos blokelis; Aukštakulnių batelių formavimo priemonė; Vientisa; Padalintas priekis; Spyruoklinis; Teleskopinė / reguliuojamo ilgio; Kelioninė (sulankstoma); Kita
nl: Schoenspanner-ontwerp: Laarzenspanner; Hangend cederblok; Spanner voor pumps/hoge hakken; Massief (uit één stuk); Gespleten neus; Veerbelast; Telescopische/verstelbare lengte; Reizen (opvouwbaar); Overig
ro-RO: Designul calapodului: Formă pentru cizme; Bloc de cedru suspendat; Formă pentru pantofi cu toc; Solid (monobloc); Vârf separat; Încărcat cu arc; Telescopic/lungime ajustabilă; Călătorie (pliabil); Altele
ja: シューツリーのデザイン: ブーツシェイパー; 吊り下げ式杉板; パンプス/ハイヒールシェイパー; ソリッド（ワンピース）; スプリットトゥ; スプリング式; 伸縮式/長さ調節可能; 旅行用（折りたたみ式）; その他
th: การออกแบบที่ดันทรงรองเท้า: อุปกรณ์จัดทรงรองเท้า; บล็อกไม้ซีดาร์สำหรับแขวน; ที่ปรับรูปทรงรองเท้าพัมพ์/ส้นสูง; แบบแข็ง (ชิ้นเดียว); แยกนิ้วเท้า; แบบหัวสปริง; ยืดหดได้/ปรับความยาวได้; สำหรับเดินทาง (พับเก็บได้); อื่นๆ
pl: Konstrukcja prawideł do butów: Prawidło do kozaków; Wiszący klocek cedrowy; Forma do szpilek; Pełne (jednoczęściowe); Rozszerzane w palcach (split toe); Ze sprężyną; Teleskopowe / regulowana długość; Podróżne (składane); Inne
cs: Konstrukce napínáků do bot: Tvarovač bot; Závěsný z cedru; Na tvarování lodiček / bot na vysokém podpatku; Pevný (jednodílný); Rozdělená špička; Pružinový napínák; Teleskopický / s nastavitelnou délkou; Cestovní (skládací); Jiné
fi: Kenkälestin muotoilu: Saappaiden muotoilija; Riippuva setripuulohko; Korkokenkien lepolesti; Kiinteä (yksiosainen); Halkaistu kärki; Jousikuormitteinen; Teleskooppinen/säädettävä pituus; Matkakäyttöinen (kokoontaitettava); Muu
el: Σχεδιασμός καλαποδιού: Καλαπόδι μπότας; Κρεμαστό μπλοκ κέδρου; Γόβα/ψηλοτάκουνο φορμάκι; Στερεό (μονοκόμματο); Split δάχτυλο; Με ελατήριο; Τηλεσκοπικό/ρυθμιζόμενο μήκος; Ταξίδι (πτυσσόμενο); Άλλο
de: Schuhspannerdesign: Stiefeldehner; Hängender Zedernblock; Pumps-/High-Heel-Former; Massiv (einteilig); Split-Toe; Gefedert; Teleskopisch/verstellbare Länge; Reise (zusammenklappbar); Sonstiges
sk-SK: Dizajn napínadla na topánky: Napínač obuvi; Závesný cédrový napínak; napínak do lodičiek; Pevný (jednodielny); Napínak s rozdelenou špičkou; Napnutý pružinou; Teleskopická/nastaviteľná dĺžka; Cestovný (skladací); Iné
sl-SI: Oblika lesenega vložka za obutev: Napenjalec za škornje; Viseči cedrov blok; Oblikovalec čevljev s črpalko/visoko peto; Trdna (enodelna); Split prst na nogi; Vzmetna; Teleskopska/nastavljiva dolžina; Potovalni (zložljivi); Drug
es: Diseño de hormas para zapatos: Horma para botas; Bloque de cedro colgante; Moldeador de tacones altos; Sólido (de una sola pieza); Punta dividida; Con resorte; Longitud telescópica/ajustable; Viajes (plegables); Otros
it: Design del tendiscarpe: Tendistivale; Blocco di cedro sospeso; Modellatore per tacchi alti/décolleté; Solido (monoblocco); Punta divisa; Caricato a molla; Lunghezza telescopica/regolabile; Viaggio (pieghevole); Altro